Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB665.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 150.725 TO 150.735 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in the event of a natural
disaster or declared emergency, as defined in KRS 39A.020, the Department of
Agriculture shall have sole authority to administer and enforce the permitting, holding,
and fencing requirements of captive cervids.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/18/2026 10:18 AM Jacketed